Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.230

Drawing and issuance of warrants.

Second-class school districts, subject to the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, may draw and issue warrants for the payment of moneys upon approval of a majority of the board of directors, such warrants to be signed by the chair of the board and countersigned by the secretary: PROVIDED, That when, in the judgment of the board of directors, the orders for warrants issued by the district monthly shall have reached such numbers that the signing of each warrant by the chair of the board personally imposes too great a task on the chair, the board of directors, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the chair of the board, authorizing said treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name and amount, and the funds on which said warrants shall be drawn; thereupon the secretary of said board shall be authorized to draw and sign said orders for warrants. Orders for warrants and warrant registers may be sent in an electronic format and using facsimile signatures as provided under chapter 39.62 RCW.

[ 2012 c 209 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 352; 1983 c 56 s 10; 1975 c 43 s 21; 1973 c 111 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.60.328.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Severability—1973 c 111: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 111 s 6.]